Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 23 Hides and Carcasses

Cross references. —

As to sale of carcass of animal killed to ascertain ownership of brand, see §

11-20-302

.

As to inclusion of animal carcasses or parts thereof in definition of “garbage” in connection with feeding untreated garbage to swine, see §

11-27-101

.

As to removing hides from carcasses without permission, see §

11-30-106

.

As to requiring legislature to provide for protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-126

.

As to hides and carcasses of game animals generally, see title 23.

As to food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.